Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-248.01
Certificate of dissolution of marriage.

A certificate of dissolution of marriage executed by the clerk of the district court under section 42-372.02 may be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county or counties where the real estate is located. A certificate of dissolution of marriage shall not be used in lieu of a deed or other conveyance of real estate to carry out the terms of the dissolution decree or as evidence of title.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 24.